Massachusetts, session 194th, H4167.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The following words, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, shall 
have the following meanings: 
“Checkout Bag” shall mean a bag provided by a retail establishment to a customer at the 
point of sale. Checkout bags shall not include any type of bag, used by a retail establishment, or 
provided to its customer for: 
1. prescription medications, 
2. produce, bakery items, and other food items to keep such items fresh or unsoiled, 
3. preventing frozen food items, including ice cream, from thawing, 

of 3 9  4. containing products or items that are saturated, wet, prone to leak, or need to be 
immersed in a liquid, 
5. containing products or items that are granular, powdery, dirty or greasy, 
6. protecting an item from damage or contamination, or to protect a second item when 
both are carried together from the retail establishment, 
7. protecting articles of clothing on a hanger, 
8. items that contain any herbicide, pesticide, solvent, corrosive, automotive type fluid or 
other chemical, that can be harmful to public health, whether or not, the item is prepackaged in a 
sealed container or bag, 
9. protecting small items from loss, 
10. any item that requires the use of a certain type bag, under federal and state laws and 
regulations. 
“Retail Establishment” shall mean any business facility that sells goods directly to the 
consumer whether for or not for profit, including but not limited to, retail stores, restaurants, 
pharmacies, convenience and grocery stores, liquor stores, and seasonal and temporary 
businesses. 
SECTION 2. 
(a) Notwithstanding any general or specific law to the contrary, any retail establishment 
which makes available checkout bags in the Town of Acton shall charge for each such bag a fee 

of 3 28 equal to or greater than $0.15 per checkout bag, as established by regulations to be duly 
promulgated by the Acton Board of Health. 
(b) All monies collected pursuant to this section shall be retained by the retail 
establishment. 
(c) Any charge for a checkout bag shall be separately stated on a receipt provided to the 
customer at the time of sale and shall be identified as the “checkout bag charge” thereon. 
SECTION 3. 
(a) The Health Agent for the Acton Board of Health or his/her designee shall have 
authority to oversee this Act and any regulations promulgated thereunder. 
(b) The Acton Board of Health may adopt and amend rules and regulations to effectuate 
the purposes of this Act. 
SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act is declared to be invalid or unenforceable, the 
other provisions shall be severable and shall not be affected thereby. 
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect three months after its passage.